Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB430.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 117 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "large public university campus" means the largest
campus of a public university where undergraduate and graduate enrollment
combined exceeds five thousand (5,000) students.
(2) Each county board of elections of a county that has a large public university
campus within its jurisdiction shall:
(a) Conduct election day voting at the student union on campus or another on-
campus location if it is more convenient for students;
(b) Conduct no-excuse in-person absentee voting, pursuant to KRS 117.076(1),
at the student union on campus or another on-campus location if it is more
convenient for students; and
(c) To the extent possible, provide on-campus voting locations with ballot forms
for all legislative and council precincts within three (3) miles of campus.
(3) The governing board of each large public university shall make the necessary
space available and coordinate with election authorities and students to make it
possible for the county board of elections to comply with this section.
Section 2. This Act shall be known as the Right to Vote at College Campuses
Act.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:52 AM Jacketed